Maine, session 132, LD1348.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 14 MRSA §8102, sub-§1-D is enacted to read:
1-D. Field trip. "Field trip" means an excursion of students conducted by an
elementary or secondary school to a location away from the school for educational or
recreational purposes. "Field trip" does not include a sporting, extracurricular, club or other
event or activity in which there is an inherent risk of physical injury.
Sec. 2. 14 MRSA §8105, sub-§1, as amended by PL 1999, c. 460, §1 and affected
by §2, is further amended to read:
1. Limit established. In Except as provided in subsection 6, in any claim or cause of
action permitted by this chapter, the award of damages, including costs, against either a
governmental entity or its employees, or both, may not exceed $400,000 for any and all
claims arising out of a single occurrence.
Sec. 3. 14 MRSA §8105, sub-§6 is enacted to read:
6. Field trips. In a claim or cause of action permitted by this chapter, the award of
damages, including costs, against a governmental entity for a negligent act or omission in
the planning, transportation, administration, supervision or execution of a field trip may
not exceed $5,000,000 for any claims arising out of a single occurrence.